Illinois, session 104th, HB3482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 143.19.6 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/143.19.6 new)7    Sec. 143.19.6. Use of credit score and age in determining 8rates or premiums for certain vehicle insurance; use of 9applications prohibited. 10    (a) When determining rates or premiums for insurance on 11risks in this State as described in clause (b) of Class 2 and 12clause (e) of Class 3 of Section 4 of this Code, insurance 13issuers may not consider or otherwise use an individual's 14credit-based insurance score or age if the age of the insured 15is 50 years of age or more.16    (b) A policy of automobile insurance, including any class 17of motor vehicle coverage, may not be canceled by the insurer 18solely because the insured has reached the age of 65 years so 19long as the insured has a valid Illinois driver's license. An 20insurer shall not refuse to issue a renewal policy or increase 21the premium for any policy solely because an insured has 22attained the age of 65 years or older.23    (c) Providers of automobile insurance shall not consider   HB3482- 2 -LRB104 11291 BAB 21377 b1any data obtained from applications on an insured's cellular 2phone or that may be installed, either at the time of 3manufacture or later, in the insured's motor vehicle for 4purposes of establishing premiums or rates with the express 5written consent of the insured. Providers are prohibited from 6increasing rates or premiums on the basis that express written 7consent of the insured is withheld.